netlify/functions/hello-world/verbs.dix
<dictionary>
<alphabet>abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwxyzABCDEFGHIJKLMNOPQRSTUVWXYZ</alphabet>

<sdefs>
    <!-- TYPE -->
    <sdef n="verb" />
    
    <!-- PRAYOGA -->
    <sdef n="karwari" />
    <sdef n="karmaNi" />

    <!-- LAKARAS -->
    <sdef n="lat" />
    <sdef n="lit" />
    <sdef n="lut" />
    <sdef n="lqt" />
    <sdef n="lot" />
    <sdef n="laf" />
    <sdef n="viXilif" />
    <sdef n="ASIrlif" />
    <sdef n="luf" />
    <sdef n="lqf" />

    <!-- PURUSHA & VACANA -->
    <sdef n="11" />
    <sdef n="12" />
    <sdef n="13" />
    <sdef n="21" />
    <sdef n="22" />
    <sdef n="23" />
    <sdef n="31" />
    <sdef n="32" />
    <sdef n="33" />

    <!-- PADI -->
    <sdef n="PP" />
    <sdef n="AP" />

    <!-- GANA -->
    <sdef n="BvAxi" />
    <sdef n="axAxi" />
    <sdef n="juhowyAxi" />
    <sdef n="xivAxi" />
    <sdef n="svAxi" />
    <sdef n="wuxAxi" />
    <sdef n="ruXAxi" />
    <sdef n="wanAxi" />
    <sdef n="kryAxi" />
    <sdef n="curAxi" />
</sdefs>

<pardefs>
    <!-- VARIANT INDICES -->

    <pardef n="var_1">
        <e><p><l></l><r>1</r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="var_2">
        <e><p><l></l><r>2</r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="var_3">
        <e><p><l></l><r>3</r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="var_4">
        <e><p><l></l><r>4</r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="var_5">
        <e><p><l></l><r>5</r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="var_6">
        <e><p><l></l><r>6</r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- PREFIXES -->

    <pardef n="at_a">
        <e><p><l>a</l><r></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="at_ac">
        <e><p><l>ac</l><r></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="at_O">
        <e><p><l>O</l><r></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="at_a_A">
        <e><p><l>A</l><r>a</r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="at_A_A">
        <e><p><l>A</l><r>A</r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="at_i_E">
        <e><p><l>E</l><r>i</r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="at_i_Ay">
        <e><p><l>Ay</l><r>i</r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="at_I_E">
        <e><p><l>E</l><r>I</r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="at_I_Ay">
        <e><p><l>Ay</l><r>I</r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="at_u_O">
        <e><p><l>O</l><r>u</r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="at_u_Av">
        <e><p><l>Av</l><r>u</r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="at_U_O">
        <e><p><l>O</l><r>U</r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="at_q_Ar">
        <e><p><l>Ar</l><r>q</r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="at_Q_Ar">
        <e><p><l>Ar</l><r>Q</r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="at_e_E">
        <e><p><l>E</l><r>e</r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="at_o_O">
        <e><p><l>O</l><r>o</r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="up_aXi">
        <e><p><l>aXi</l><r></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="up_aX">
        <e><p><l>aX</l><r></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="up_aXy">
        <e><p><l>aXy</l><r></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="up_A">
        <e><p><l>A</l><r></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="up_anu">
        <e><p><l>anu</l><r></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="up_anva">
        <e><p><l>anva</l><r></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="up_ux">
        <e><p><l>ux</l><r></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="up_vi">
        <e><p><l>vi</l><r></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="up_vy">
        <e><p><l>vy</l><r></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ab_a_A">
        <e><p><l>A</l><r>a</r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ab_A">
        <e><p><l>A</l><r></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ab_i">
        <e><p><l>i</l><r></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ab_i_I">
        <e><p><l>I</l><r>i</r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ab_iy">
        <e><p><l>iy</l><r></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ab_u">
        <e><p><l>u</l><r></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ab_u_U">
        <e><p><l>U</l><r>u</r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ab_U">
        <e><p><l>U</l><r></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ab_ca">
        <e><p><l>ca</l><r></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ab_cac">
        <e><p><l>cac</l><r></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ab_ci">
        <e><p><l>ci</l><r></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ab_cic">
        <e><p><l>cic</l><r></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ab_cI">
        <e><p><l>cI</l><r></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ab_cIc">
        <e><p><l>cIc</l><r></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ab_cu">
        <e><p><l>cu</l><r></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ab_cuc">
        <e><p><l>cuc</l><r></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ab_cU">
        <e><p><l>cU</l><r></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ab_cUc">
        <e><p><l>cUc</l><r></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ab_ja">
        <e><p><l>ja</l><r></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ab_ju">
        <e><p><l>ju</l><r></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ab_jU">
        <e><p><l>jU</l><r></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ab_ji">
        <e><p><l>ji</l><r></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ab_jI">
        <e><p><l>jI</l><r></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ab_Fu">
        <e><p><l>Fu</l><r></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ab_dI">
        <e><p><l>dI</l><r></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ab_du">
        <e><p><l>du</l><r></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ab_wa">
        <e><p><l>wa</l><r></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ab_wi">
        <e><p><l>wi</l><r></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ab_wu">
        <e><p><l>wu</l><r></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ab_wU">
        <e><p><l>wU</l><r></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ab_xa">
        <e><p><l>xa</l><r></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ab_xi">
        <e><p><l>xi</l><r></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ab_xI">
        <e><p><l>xI</l><r></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ab_xu">
        <e><p><l>xu</l><r></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ab_n">
        <e><p><l>n</l><r></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ab_ni">
        <e><p><l>ni</l><r></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ab_nu">
        <e><p><l>nu</l><r></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ab_ne">
        <e><p><l>ne</l><r></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ab_pa">
        <e><p><l>pa</l><r></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ab_pi">
        <e><p><l>pi</l><r></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ab_ba">
        <e><p><l>ba</l><r></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ab_bi">
        <e><p><l>bi</l><r></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ab_bI">
        <e><p><l>bI</l><r></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ab_bu">
        <e><p><l>bu</l><r></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ab_ma">
        <e><p><l>ma</l><r></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ab_mI">
        <e><p><l>mI</l><r></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ab_mi">
        <e><p><l>mi</l><r></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ab_la">
        <e><p><l>la</l><r></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ab_lI">
        <e><p><l>lI</l><r></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ab_va">
        <e><p><l>va</l><r></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ab_vi">
        <e><p><l>vi</l><r></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ab_vI">
        <e><p><l>vI</l><r></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ab_vu">
        <e><p><l>vu</l><r></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ab_vo">
        <e><p><l>vo</l><r></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ab_ya">
        <e><p><l>ya</l><r></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ab_yu">
        <e><p><l>yu</l><r></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ab_ye">
        <e><p><l>ye</l><r></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ab_sa">
        <e><p><l>sa</l><r></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="i4"><par n="up_aX"/><par n="mr_i_I"/><par n="var_4"/><par n="la_lot_yak_axAxi"/></e>
    <e lm="GuR2"><i>GuR</i><par n="var_2"/><par n="la_lat_yak_BvAxi"/></e>
    <e lm="i4"><par n="up_aXy"/><par n="at_i_E"/><par n="var_4"/><par n="la_lqf_krm_axAxi_R"/></e>
    <e lm="i4"><par n="up_aXy"/><par n="at_i_Ay"/><par n="var_4"/><par n="la_lqf_krm_axAxi_iR"/></e>
    <e lm="I1"><par n="at_I_Ay"/><par n="var_1"/><par n="la_lqf_krm_xivAxi_iR"/></e>
    <e lm="u1"><par n="at_u_Av"/><par n="var_1"/><par n="la_lqf_krm_BvAxi_iR"/></e>
    <e lm="UrNu1"><par n="at_U_O"/><i>rN</i><par n="mr_u_uv"/><par n="var_1"/><par n="la_lqf_krm_axAxi_iR"/></e>
    <e lm="q1"><par n="at_q_Ar"/><i></i><par n="var_1"/><par n="la_lqf_krm_BvAxi_iR"/></e>
    <e lm="Q1"><par n="at_Q_Ar"/><par n="var_1"/><par n="la_lqf_krm_kryAxi_IR"/></e>
    <e lm="kuW1"><i>ku</i><par n="ma_n"/><i>W</i><par n="var_1"/><par n="la_ASIrlif_krm_BvAxi_iR"/></e>
    <e lm="oK1"><par n="at_o_O"/><i>K</i><par n="var_1"/><par n="la_lqf_krm_BvAxi_iR"/></e>
    <e lm="IK1"><par n="at_I_E"/><par n="ma_f"/><i>K</i><par n="var_1"/><par n="la_lqf_krm_BvAxi_iR"/></e>
    <e lm="uC1"><par n="up_vy"/><i>u</i><par n="ma_c"/><i>C</i><par n="var_1"/><par n="la_lut_krm_BvAxi_iw"/></e>
    <e lm="ev1"><par n="at_e_E"/><i>v</i><par n="var_1"/><par n="la_lqf_krm_BvAxi_iR"/></e>
    <e lm="ruX2"><par n="up_anu"/><i>r</i><par n="mr_u_o"/><par n="mr_X_w"/><par n="var_2"/><par n="la_lqt_krm_xivAxi_s"/></e>
    <e lm="ruX2"><par n="up_anva"/><i>r</i><par n="mr_u_o"/><par n="mr_X_w"/><par n="var_2"/><par n="la_lqf_krm_xivAxi_s"/></e>
    <e lm="uC3"><par n="at_u_O"/><par n="ma_c"/><i>C</i><par n="var_3"/><par n="la_lqf_krm_wuxAxi_iR"/></e>
    <e lm="Cqx1"><par n="at_ac"/><i>C</i><par n="mr_q_ar"/><i>x</i><par n="var_1"/><par n="la_lqf_krm_ruXAxi_iR"/></e>
    <e lm="lad3"><par n="at_O"/><i>la</i><par n="ma_N"/><i>d</i><par n="var_3"/><par n="la_lqf_krm_curAxi_iR_ay"/></e>
    <e lm="SraN3"><par n="up_vi"/><i>Sr</i><par n="mr_a_A"/><i>N</i><par n="var_3"/><par n="la_ASIrlif_krm_curAxi_iR"/></e>
    <e lm="cap3"><par n="at_a"/><i>ca</i><par n="ma_m"/><i>p</i><par n="var_3"/><par n="la_lqf_krm_curAxi_iR_ay"/></e>
    <e lm="il2"><par n="at_i_E"/><i>l</i><par n="var_2"/><par n="la_lqf_krm_curAxi_iR"/></e>
    <e lm="ciw3"><i>c</i><par n="mr_i_e"/><i>w</i><par n="var_3"/><par n="la_lut_krm_curAxi_iw_ay"/></e>
    <e lm="kranx1"><par n="up_A"/><i>kranx</i><par n="var_1"/><par n="la_ASIrlif_krm_curAxi_iR"/></e>
    <e lm="vas4"><i>v</i><par n="mr_a_A"/><i>s</i><par n="var_4"/><par n="la_lut_krm_curAxi_iw"/></e>
    <e lm="lut6"><i>l</i><par n="mr_u_o"/><i>t</i><par n="var_6"/><par n="la_ASIrlif_krm_curAxi_iR"/></e>
    <e lm="Ap2"><par n="at_A_A"/><i>p</i><par n="var_2"/><par n="la_lqf_krm_curAxi_iR_ay"/></e>
    <e lm="arWa1"><par n="at_a_A"/><i>rW</i><par n="md_a"/><par n="var_1"/><par n="la_lqf_krm_curAxi_iR"/></e>
    <e lm="i3"><par n="ab_i"/><par n="mr_i_y"/><par n="var_3"/><par n="la_lit_krm_BvAxi"/></e>
    <e lm="kaR1"><par n="ab_ca"/><i>kaR</i><par n="var_1"/><par n="la_lit_krm_BvAxi"/></e>
    <e lm="ve1"><par n="ab_U"/><p><l>v</l><r>ve</r></p><par n="var_1"/><par n="la_lit_krm_BvAxi"/></e>
    <e lm="i2"><par n="up_aXi"/><par n="ab_ja"/><p><l>g</l><r>i</r></p><par n="var_2"/><par n="la_lit_krm_axAxi_A"/></e>
    <e lm="uc1"><par n="ab_u_U"/><i>c</i><par n="var_1"/><par n="la_lit_krm_xivAxi"/></e>
    <e lm="vij2"><par n="up_ux"/><par n="ab_vi"/><i>vij</i><par n="var_2"/><par n="la_lit_krm_wuxAxi"/></e>
    <e lm="jarj2"><par n="ab_ja"/><i>jarj</i><par n="var_2"/><par n="la_lit_krm_wuxAxi"/></e>
    <e lm="qP1"><par n="ab_A"/><par n="ma_n"/><i>qP</i><par n="var_1"/><par n="la_lit_krm_wuxAxi"/></e>
    <e lm="iR2"><par n="ab_i_I"/><i>R</i><par n="var_2"/><par n="la_lit_krm_wuxAxi"/></e>
    <e lm="lut5"><par n="ab_lu"/><i>lut</i><par n="var_5"/><par n="la_lit_krm_wuxAxi"/></e>
    <e lm="Cqx1"><par n="ab_cac"/><i>Cqx</i><par n="var_1"/><par n="la_lit_krm_ruXAxi"/></e>
    <e lm="aS2"><par n="ab_a_A"/><i>S</i><par n="var_2"/><par n="la_lit_krm_kryAxi"/></e>
